California statutes. Education Code
(a) Members of the county board of education shall be elected on the date and in the manner prescribed for the election of members of governing boards of school districts, provided the elections are held throughout the county on the same date; otherwise the election shall be consolidated with the direct primary election. Once established, no subsequent change of circumstances shall require that the time of holding the election be changed. Where the elections for governing board members are held on the same date, then the provisions of Section 5303 shall apply to the election of members of the county board of education. Elections held pursuant to this article shall be conducted by the county board of education. Members elected at the time of the direct primary shall take office on the first
 day of July, and members elected at the date on which members of school district governing boards are elected shall take office on the second Friday in December subsequent to their election. The county committee on school district organization shall determine the manner in which the county board of education first elected shall effect a staggering of terms.

(b) This section shall govern the election and term of office of members of a county board of education except as provided under
 Sections 1302 and 10404.5 of the Elections Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 146, Sec. 1.   (AB 2449)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

1008.

When any vacancy exists on the county board of education of any county on or after December 1, 1978, the vacancy shall be filled in the manner prescribed in Article 3 (commencing with Section 5090) of Chapter 1 of Part 4.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

1009.

The county board of education shall organize at a meeting held in each year by electing one of their number president of the board. The meeting at which the organization is conducted shall be either the first meeting on or after the second Friday in December, or the first meeting on or after the first day in July, depending upon whether, pursuant to Section 1007, the terms of office of board members commence on the
 second Friday in December or the first day in July.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 146, Sec. 2.   (AB 2449)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

1010.

The county superintendent of schools is ex officio secretary and executive officer of the board.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

1011.

Regular meetings of the board shall be held at times it may determine, but not less than once per month and shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 54950) of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1452, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

1012.

Special meetings may be called by the president whenever, in his judgment, the exigencies of the schools require them to be held. Upon the request of any three members, in writing, the president shall call a special meeting.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

1013.

A majority of the members shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

1014.

No teacher’s certificate shall be issued or renewed, nor shall any books or apparatus be adopted except by an affirmative vote of at least a majority of the members of the board.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

1015.

On the call of any member, the ayes and nays shall be taken upon any proposition, and the vote shall be recorded in the minutes of the board.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

1016.

At special meetings, no business shall be transacted other than such as may be specified in the call of the president, except that certificates to teach, upon credentials, may be granted, and unexpired certificates to teach may be renewed at any meeting of the board.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

1017.

In those counties in which the election of members of county boards of education are required to be held on the same date as prescribed for the election of members of governing boards of school districts, as provided in Section 1007, the offices of those members of the county board of education whose terms have been fixed to expire in even-numbered years shall become vacant upon the expiration of those terms. The vacancies arising shall be filled by the majority of the remaining members of the board, and the appointees shall hold office only until the first day of July following the election of their successors.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Duties and Responsibilities [1040. - 1048.]

1040.

County boards of education shall:

(a) Adopt rules and regulations not inconsistent with the laws of this state, for their own government.

(b) Keep a record of their proceedings.

(c) Approve the annual budget of the county superintendent of schools before its submission to the county board of supervisors.

(d) Approve the annual county school service fund budget of the county superintendent of schools before its submission to the Superintendent of Public Instruction.

(e) Review, as a scheduled agenda item at a regularly scheduled public meeting held pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 1000) of this chapter, the report of the annual audit provided for by the county superintendent of schools under Section 41020.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 741, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1041.

County boards of education may:

(a) Adopt and use an official seal in authentication of their acts.

(b) Have such printing done as may be necessary.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

1042.

County boards of education may do all of the following:

(a) Adopt rules and regulations governing the administration of the office of the county superintendent of schools.

(b) Review the county superintendent of schools annual itemized estimate of anticipated revenue and expenditures before the annual itemized estimate is filed with the auditor as required by Section 29040 of the Government Code, and make revisions, reductions, or additions in the annual itemized estimate it deems advisable and proper. An annual itemized estimate shall not be filed by the county superintendent of schools or be approved by the board of supervisors until it has first been so reviewed and approved by the county board of
 education.

(c) In the name by which the board of education is designated, acquire, lease, lease-purchase, hold, and convey real property for the purpose of housing the offices and the services of the county superintendent of schools, except that this subdivision shall only apply to the county boards of education to which all or a portion of the duties and functions of the county board of supervisors specified in subdivision (b) of Section 1080 have been transferred, with the exception of the recreational duties and recreational functions specified in subdivisions (c) and (d) of Section 1080.

(d) Contract with and employ any persons for the furnishing to the county board of education of special services and advice in financial, economic, accounting, engineering, legal, or administrative matters if these persons are specially trained and experienced and competent to perform the
 special services required. The county board of education may pay from any available funds the compensation that it deems proper for the services rendered.

(e) (1) Notwithstanding Section 25304 of the Government Code, fill by appointment any vacancy that occurs during the term of office of the county superintendent of schools. In a county in which the superintendent is elected, the appointee shall hold office until the office is filled by election at the next gubernatorial election.

(2) The authority described in this subdivision shall be vested in a county board of education only upon its adoption by the board at a public meeting held pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 1000).

(f) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2017.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 1) and added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 38, Sec. 2.   (SB 1016)   Effective June 27, 2012.   Section operative July 1, 2017, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

1043.

Upon the adoption of a resolution by the board of supervisors of the county consenting to the transfer of the functions specified in this section, the functions specified in this section shall be transferred from the county board of supervisors to the county board of education. The functions, including, but not limited to, the receipt of petition and reports and other papers, are those specified in Sections 35001, 35002, 35676, 35698, 35699, 35703, 35704, 35705, 35722, 35723, 35724, 74100, 74104, 74131, 74132, 74134, 74151, 74153, 74156, 74250, 74251, and 74295.

Upon the adoption of the resolution, any reference, with respect to that county, in those sections to the board of supervisors shall be deemed to be a reference to the county board of education of that county and any reference to the clerk of the county board of supervisors shall be deemed to be a reference to the secretary of the county board of education of that county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

1044.

Any county board of education may secure copyrights, in the name of the board, to all copyrightable works developed by the board, and royalties or revenue from such copyrights are to be for the benefit of the board securing such copyrights.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

1045.

Any county board of education may, in accordance with regulations adopted by the board and for educational use, sell, give, or exchange for similar published materials, published materials prepared by the board in connection with the curricular and special services that the board is authorized to perform. Unless restricted by the regulations of the board, the sale or gift may be made to, and the exchange may be made with, any person, political subdivision, public officer or agency, or educational institution. The distribution of the published material in accordance with this section is declared to be a public purpose and in furtherance of Section 1 of Article IX of the California Constitution.

Any county board of education may also license the use of copyrights held by the board, to the same persons or entities and for the same purposes as provided in the prior paragraph.

The board shall grant such a license to any public agency organized under the authority of this state, unless an exclusive license has previously been granted a private publisher.

Any charge which may be assessed such a public agency for the license to use the copyright or for materials, to which the board holds the copyright, shall not exceed the cost to the board of the preparation and reproduction of the materials.

Any granting of a license, by a county board of education, to reproduce copyrighted material is declared to be for a public purpose in furtherance of Section 1 of Article IX of the California Constitution.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

1046.

The county board of education in any county required to provide for the education and training of handicapped persons residing in the county, when in its judgment necessity therefor exists, may construct and maintain dormitories for use and occupancy by such persons, and shall fix the rates to be charged such persons, or parents or guardians of such persons, for quarters in the dormitories.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

1047.

A county board of education, to which all of the duties and functions of the county board of supervisors have been transferred pursuant to Section 1080 may exercise the power of eminent domain to acquire any property necessary or convenient for carrying out the provisions of this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 143, Sec. 1.   Effective May 30, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

1048.

If a county board of education, county office of education, or county superintendent of schools enters into an agreement to let to any person, firm, or corporation any real property that belongs to the county office of education or a school district and requires the lessee to construct on the demised premises or provide for the construction of a building for use by the county office of education or a school district, the county board of
 education, county office of education, or county superintendent of schools shall comply with all requirements applicable to the governing board of a school district pursuant to Sections 17406, 17407, and 17407.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 125, Sec. 1.   (AB 591)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Transfer of Duties and Functions to County Board of Education [1080. - 1082.]

1080.

The county board of supervisors, by resolution, may transfer all of the following duties and functions of the county board of supervisors to the county board of education:

(a) Approval of the county superintendent’s estimate of anticipated revenue and expenditures pursuant to Section 1042 following which it shall be filed with the county board of supervisors.

(b) Allowance of the actual and necessary travel expenses, the expenses of the office of the county superintendent of schools, and the expenses of providing housing for all the services of the county superintendent of schools pursuant to Sections 1200, 1201, 1202, and 1203.

(c) By agreement with the county board of education, any other duties and functions of an educational, or educational and recreational, nature which by law are required or permitted to be performed by the county board of supervisors.

(d) By agreement with the county board of education, the community recreation functions authorized by Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 10900) of Part 7 of this division.

The transfer of duties and functions under the provisions of this article shall not alter the requirement that the expenses for those duties and functions be paid out of the county general fund as provided elsewhere in this code, provided however that the county board of supervisors and the county board of education may agree that all or any portion of the expenses for those duties and functions that are by law required or permitted to be paid from the county general fund shall be included in that part of the single budget prepared by the county board of education for which a county tax is levied pursuant to Section 1623.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1452, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

1081.

Upon the transfer of duties and functions to the county board of education pursuant to Section 1080, the county superintendent of schools may, with the approval of the county board of education, pay actual and necessary travel expenses incurred by the county superintendent of schools or by his designated staff members in accordance with regulations established by the county board of education. The board may authorize an advance of funds to cover such necessary traveling expenses. Such advance shall be repaid or adjusted upon the filing of a regular claim for the actual and necessary traveling expenses incurred.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

1082.

A county board of education to which functions and duties under this article have been transferred may enter into agreements for the acquisition of real property or improvements as authorized by the County Employees Retirement Law of 1937.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Salaries and Expenses [1090. - 1097.]

1090.

(a) The board of supervisors may allow, as compensation, to each regular member of the county board of education a sum not to exceed the following amounts:

(1) In any class one county, each regular member of the county board of education who actually attends all meetings held may receive as compensation for the regular member’s services a sum not to exceed three thousand dollars ($3,000) per month.

(2) In any class two county, each regular member of the county board of education who actually attends all meetings held may
 receive as compensation for the regular member’s services a sum not to exceed two thousand dollars ($2,000) per month.

(3) In any class three county, each regular member of the county board of education who actually attends all meetings held may receive as compensation for the regular member’s services a sum not to exceed one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) per month.

(4) In any class four county, each regular member of the county board of education who actually attends all meetings held may receive as compensation for the regular member’s services a sum not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) per month.

(5) In any class five, class six, class seven, or class eight county, each regular member
 of the county board of education who actually attends all meetings held may receive as compensation for the regular member’s services a sum not to exceed eight hundred dollars ($800) per month.

(b) Any regular member or pupil member who does not attend all meetings held in any month may receive as compensation for the regular member’s or pupil member’s services, an amount not greater than the maximum amount allowed by subdivision (a) or paragraph (2) of subdivision (h), as applicable, divided by the number of meetings held, and multiplied by the number of meetings actually attended.

(c) The amount of compensation shall be determined by the county board of supervisors, or, in a county having a fiscally independent county board of education, by the county board of education.

(d) A pupil member or regular member of a county board of education may be paid for any meeting for which the member is absent if the board by resolution duly adopted and included within its minutes finds that at the time of the meeting the member was performing services outside the meeting on behalf of the board, the member was ill or on jury duty, or the absence was due to a hardship deemed acceptable by the board.

(e) There may also be allowed to each regular member who uses a privately owned automobile in the discharge of necessary official duties as a member of the county board of education, the same amount as allowed by any county official in the performance of the county official’s duties. The mileage rate allowed in this section shall be based on the total mileage claimed in a
 calendar month.

(f) For purposes of this section, the classification of counties shall be determined pursuant to Section 1205.

(g) On an annual basis, the county board of education may increase the compensation of individual regular members of the board beyond the limits delineated in this section, in an amount not to exceed 5 percent based on the present monthly rate of compensation. Any increase made pursuant to this section shall be effective upon approval by the county board of education. This action may be rejected by a majority of the voters in that county voting in a referendum established for that purpose, as prescribed by Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 9100) of Division 9 of the Elections Code.

(h) The county board of education may award a pupil member either or both of the following:

(1) Elective course credit based on the number of equivalent daily instructional minutes for the pupil member’s services provided.

(2) Monthly financial compensation as determined by the county board of education.

(i) As used in this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Pupil member” means a pupil board member appointed pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1000.

(2) “Regular member” means a board member elected or selected pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section
 1000.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 639, Sec. 1.   (AB 1390)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

1090.1.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, and to the extent permitted by federal law, any compensation awarded to a pupil member pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1090 shall not be considered as income or resources when determining eligibility and benefit amount for any means-tested program, including, but not limited to, CalWORKs, General Assistance, Medi-Cal, and Cash Assistance Program for Immigrants (CAPI), and any scholarships for public colleges and universities, including, but not limited to, Cal Grant awards, Chafee grant awards, Middle Class Scholarship Program awards, California College Promise Grants, California State University Educational Opportunity Program (EOP) grants, Community College Extended Opportunity Programs and Services (EOPS) grants, and grants from the University of California or
 the California State University.

(b) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the State Department of Social Services may implement, interpret, or make specific this section for programs under its jurisdiction by means of all-county letters or similar written instructions from the department until regulations are adopted. These all-county letters or similar instructions shall have the same force and effect as regulations until the adoption of regulations.

(c) This section shall apply to programs under the jurisdiction of the State Department of Social Services beginning on the date that the State Department of Social Services notifies the Legislature that the California Statewide Automated Welfare System can perform the necessary automation
 to implement this section for those programs. The department shall issue guidance as necessary to begin automation no later than July 1, 2026.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 686, Sec. 1.   (AB 320)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

1091.

If the members of the board of supervisors of any county are not allowed mileage, the board of supervisors of the county shall allow to each member of the county board of education of that county actual and necessary traveling expenses not exceeding twenty-five cents ($0.25) per mile one way in attending the meetings of the board.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

1092.

The secretary may be allowed the sum of ten dollars ($10) per day for the actual time that the board may be in session.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

1093.

Compensation of the members of the board, shall be payable out of the county general fund.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

1094.

Expenses for printing required by the county board of education, and all incidental expenses incurred for stationery or other purposes in the performance of its duties, shall be audited and paid as other claims against the general fund of the county are paid.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

1095.

The county board of education may subscribe for membership in, or otherwise become a member of, any state or local organization of governing boards of school districts or members thereof, or of county boards of education or members thereof, or both, which has for its primary purpose the promotion and advancement of public education through research and investigation, and the cooperation with persons and associations whose interests and purposes are the betterment of the educational opportunities of the children of the state. The costs incurred for the purposes of this section shall be payable out of the county general fund.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

1096.

The county board of education of each county may select a member or members of the board to attend meetings of any society, association, or organization for which the board has subscribed for membership, or any convention to which the governing board of a school district or a community college district may pay the expenses of any employee. The actual expenses of the member or members shall be allowed and paid out of the county general fund with prior budgetary approval.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

1097.

Whenever a tax rate or portion thereof is levied by any county for the support of its county board of education and superintendent of schools, the assessed valuation of all, but only such portions of elementary and unified school districts under its jurisdiction, shall be considered. The tax rate or portion thereof so computed shall be levied uniformly in all such areas, irrespective of the county in which situated. All moneys collected in surrounding counties from the levy of such tax rate or portion thereof shall be remitted by the respective county auditors to the auditor of the county of jurisdiction and shall be deposited by him to the credit of the fund or funds from which the support of his county board of education and superintendent of schools is derived.

This section shall be applicable to a chartered county if Section 1001 is applicable to it.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. County Superintendents of Schools [1200. - 1350.]



  ARTICLE 1. Appointment, Qualifications, Salary and Expenses [1200. - 1209.]

1200.

Each county superintendent shall receive his actual and necessary traveling expenses. The expenses shall be allowed by the board of supervisors, and be paid out of the county general fund.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

1201.

Each county superintendent shall also receive his actual and necessary traveling expenses, when, with the approval of the board of supervisors, he attends any convention or conference to which he is called by the State Board of Education, the Superintendent of Public Instruction, or the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges, and when the board of supervisors delegates the power to perform services outside of his county either within or without the state.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

1202.

The expenses of the office of superintendent of schools for its stationery, blank books, postage, expressage, freight, telephone, telegraphing, and other necessary office expenses shall be allowed by the supervisors of the county and paid out of the general fund of the county in the same manner as other claims against the county are paid.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

1203.

The expense of providing housing for all the services of the county superintendent of schools shall be allowed by the board of supervisors of the county and paid out of the general fund of the county.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

1204.

For the purposes of the retirement system of which a county superintendent of schools is a member, all contributions by or on account of the county superintendent and all benefits to him shall be based, insofar as, and to the extent that, such contributions and benefits are based upon the compensation received by him as county superintendent of schools, upon the whole of his annual salary as county superintendent of schools regardless of the fund or funds from which paid, subject only to the maximum amount of salary on which contributions can be paid the system. If such contributions are required to be paid to the system from any fund from which any part of the annual salary of the county superintendent of schools is paid, then contributions shall be paid from each of the funds from which his annual salary is actually paid in the same proportion of the total contribution as that part of his annual salary paid from such fund is of the whole of his annual salary. Contributions which would have been made by any county superintendent of schools, or by an employer on account of said superintendent, if this section had been in effect on and after September 19, 1947, shall be made in accordance with the provisions of this section.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

1205.

For the purposes of prescribing the qualifications required of county superintendents of schools the counties are classified on the basis of the average daily attendance in the public schools as follows:

Class one (1) includes all counties with an average daily attendance of seven hundred fifty thousand (750,000) and over.

Class two (2) includes all counties with an average daily attendance of one hundred forty thousand (140,000) to seven hundred forty-nine thousand nine hundred ninety-nine (749,999), inclusive.

Class three (3) includes all counties with an average daily attendance of sixty thousand (60,000) to one hundred thirty-nine thousand nine hundred ninety-nine (139,999), inclusive.

Class four (4) includes all counties with an average daily attendance of thirty thousand (30,000) to fifty-nine thousand nine hundred ninety-nine (59,999), inclusive.

Class five (5) includes all counties with an average daily attendance of fifteen thousand (15,000) to twenty-nine thousand nine hundred ninety-nine (29,999), inclusive.

Class six (6) includes all counties with an average daily attendance of seven thousand (7,000) to fourteen thousand nine hundred ninety-nine (14,999), inclusive.

Class seven (7) includes all counties with an average daily attendance of one thousand (1,000) to six thousand nine hundred ninety-nine (6,999), inclusive.

Class eight (8) includes all counties with an average daily attendance of under one thousand (1,000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1452, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

1206.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), no person shall hereafter be elected or appointed to office as county superintendent of schools of any county who does not possess a valid credential issued by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing of the type designated in this article for each class.

(b) Where a county changes from one class to another because of an increase in the average daily attendance in the public schools of that county, the incumbent county superintendent of schools in that county shall not be prohibited from continuing in office and shall be eligible for reelection to the same office regardless of whether the incumbent county
 superintendent of schools possesses a valid credential otherwise required in a county of that class.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 273, Sec. 1.   (AB 872)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

1207.

The qualifications of the county superintendent of schools in each county shall be as set forth in Sections 1205 to 1212, inclusive, for that class into which the county falls. The class into which each county falls shall be determined on October 1st of each year based upon the average daily attendance in the public schools of such county for the preceding school year as reported to the State Department of Education. In no case will the salary of the county superintendent be lowered during his term of office.

The salaries set forth in Section 1213 are payable to incumbent county superintendents of schools; provided, however, that the salary of an incumbent shall not be reduced during the term for which he was elected or appointed or for any consecutive new term to which he is elected or appointed.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

1208.

(a) All county superintendents of schools in counties within classes (1) to (8), inclusive, shall possess a valid administrative credential issued by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing. 

(b) For purposes of this section, the possession of a valid elementary administrative credential and a valid secondary administrative credential are equivalent to the possession of a valid general administrative credential.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 273, Sec. 2.   (AB 872)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

1209.

A county superintendent of schools shall not increase his or her salary, financial remuneration, benefits, or pension in any manner or for any reason without bringing the matter to the attention of the county board of education for its discussion at a regularly scheduled public meeting of the board and without the approval of the county board of education.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 135, Sec. 30.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Duties, Responsibilities, and General Powers [1240. - 1281.]

1240.

The county superintendent of schools shall do all of the following:

(a) Superintend the schools of that county.

(b) Maintain responsibility for the fiscal oversight of each school district in that county pursuant to the authority granted by this code.

(c) (1) Visit and examine each school in the county at reasonable intervals to observe its operation and to learn of its problems. The county superintendent of schools annually may present a report of the state of the schools in the county, and of the county office of education, including, but not limited to, observations from visiting the schools, to the board of education and the board
 of supervisors of the county.

(2) (A) (i) Commencing with the 2021–22 fiscal year, the Superintendent shall identify a list of schools, which shall include charter schools, for which the county superintendent, or a designee, shall inspect annually, and about which the county superintendent, or a designee, shall submit an annual report, at a regularly scheduled November board meeting, to the governing board of each school district under the jurisdiction of the county superintendent, the county board of education of that county, and the board of supervisors of that county, that describes the state of the schools in the county. The list established in the 2021–22 fiscal year shall also be used as the list established in the 2022–23 and 2023–24 fiscal years. The list of schools established pursuant to this section shall be reestablished in the 2024–25 fiscal year and again every three fiscal years
 thereafter. Each list shall be established in accordance with clause (ii), and shall be used for inspections beginning the following fiscal year.

(ii) The list of schools pursuant to clause (i) shall be compiled as follows:

(I) The Superintendent shall include on the list all schools that were most recently identified for comprehensive support and improvement and additional targeted support and improvement pursuant to the federal Every Student Succeeds Act (Public Law 114-95) or identified as low performing under the federal Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965 (Public Law 89-10), or any subsequent amendments to that act. For the list established in the 2021–22, 2022–23, and 2023–24 fiscal years, the Superintendent shall use the list of schools identified in the 2019–20 fiscal year for comprehensive support and improvement and for additional targeted support and
 improvement.

(II) The Superintendent shall include on the list all schools where 15 percent or more of the teachers are holders of a permit or certificate, such as a temporary or short-term permit, a substitute permit, a waiver, an intern credential, or any other authorization that is a lesser certification than a preliminary or clear California teaching credential. With the exception of alternative schools, all schools within a local educational agency that fail to meet the requirements of Sections 44258.9 and 60900 shall be included on the list for the applicable reporting cycle.

(III) The list of schools compiled pursuant to clause (i) shall exclude alternative schools within the meaning of subdivision (d) of Section 52052 and other schools accepted for participation in the Dashboard Alternative School Status program by the department.

(iii) The annual report shall include the determinations for each school made by the county superintendent, or the county superintendent’s designee, regarding the status of all of the circumstances listed in subparagraph (E) and teacher misassignments and teacher vacancies, as described in Section 44258.9, and the county superintendent, or the county superintendent’s designee, shall use a standardized template to report the circumstances listed in subparagraph (E) and teacher misassignments and teacher vacancies, as described in Section 44258.9, unless the current annual report being used by the county superintendent, or the county superintendent’s designee, already includes those details with the same level of specificity that is otherwise required by this subdivision.

(B) The county superintendent of the Counties of Alpine, Amador, Del Norte, Mariposa, Plumas, and Sierra, and the City
 and County of San Francisco shall contract with another county office of education or an independent auditor to conduct the required visits and make all reports required by this paragraph.

(C) On a quarterly basis, the county superintendent, or the county superintendent’s designee, shall report the results of the visits and reviews conducted that quarter to the governing board of the school district at a regularly scheduled meeting held in accordance with public notification requirements. The results of the visits and reviews shall include the determinations of the county superintendent, or the county superintendent’s designee, for each school regarding the status of all of the circumstances listed in subparagraph (E) and teacher misassignments and teacher vacancies, as described in Section 44258.9. If the county superintendent, or the county superintendent’s designee, conducts no visits or reviews in a quarter, the quarterly report shall
 report that fact.

(D) The visits made pursuant to this paragraph shall be conducted at least annually and shall meet the following criteria:

(i) Minimize disruption to the operation of the school.

(ii) Be performed by individuals who meet the requirements of Section 45125.1.

(iii) Consist of not less than 25 percent unannounced visits in each county. During unannounced visits in each county, the county superintendent shall not demand access to documents or specific school personnel. Unannounced visits shall only be used to observe the condition of school repair and maintenance, and the sufficiency of instructional materials, as defined by Section 60119.

(E) The priority objective of the
 visits made pursuant to this paragraph shall be to determine the status of all of the following circumstances:

(i) Sufficient textbooks, as defined in Section 60119 and as specified in subdivision (i).
